Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1737
Exemption; burden of proof.

It shall not be necessary to refute the existence of any of the exemptions of the Commodity Code in any complaint, information, or indictment or any writ or proceeding brought under the code, and the burden of proof of any such exemption shall be upon the party claiming the same.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 37.